California statutes. Penal Code
(a) The Attorney General shall appoint a RAN Advisory Committee to review the master plan, policy guidelines, and administrative procedures prepared by the department and advise the Attorney General of any modifications the committee deems necessary. Final approval and acceptance of the RAN Advisory Committee proposals shall be made by the Attorney General.

(b) The RAN Advisory Committee shall be composed of one representative from each of the following: The League of California Cities, California Peace Officers’ Association, California District Attorneys’ Association, California Police Chiefs’ Association, California State Sheriffs’ Association, County Supervisors’ Association of California, Department of General Services, Office of Information Technology, and the Department of Justice. The members of the committee shall select a chairperson. The members shall serve without compensation, but reasonable and necessary travel and per diem expenses incurred by committee members shall be reimbursed by the department. The RAN Advisory Committee shall terminate January 1, 1989, unless extended by legislation enacted prior thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1234, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

11112.4.

(a) Within each county or group of counties eligible to receive funding under the department’s master plan for equipment, that elects to participate in the Remote Access Network, a local RAN board shall be established. Where a single county is eligible to receive funding, that county’s RAN board shall be the local RAN board. Where a group of counties is eligible for funding, the local RAN board shall consist of a regional board. The RAN board shall determine the placement of RAN equipment within the county or counties, and coordinate acceptance, delivery, and installation of RAN equipment. The board shall also develop any procedures necessary to regulate the ongoing use and maintenance of that equipment, adhering to the policy guidelines and procedures adopted by the department. The local board shall consider placement of equipment on the basis of the following criteria:

(1) The crime rate of the jurisdiction or jurisdictions served by the agency. 

(2) The number of criminal offenses reported by the agency or agencies to the department.

(3) The potential number of fingerprint cards and latent fingerprints processed.

(4) The number of sworn personnel of the agency or agencies.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), each RAN board shall be composed of seven members, as follows: a member of the board of supervisors, the sheriff, the district attorney, the chief of police of the Cal-ID member department having the largest number of sworn personnel within the county, a second chief selected by all other police chiefs within the county, a mayor elected by the city selection committee established pursuant to Section 50270 of the Government Code, and a member-at-large chosen by the other members. In any county lacking two chiefs of police, a substitute member shall be selected by the other members on the board. Groups of counties forming a region shall establish a seven-member board with each county having equal representation on the board and at least one member-at-large. If the number of participating counties precludes equal representation on a seven-member board, the size of the board shall be expanded so that each county has at least two representatives and there is a single member-at-large.

(c) In any county with a population of 5,000,000 or more, each local board shall be composed of seven members, as follows: a member of the board of supervisors, the sheriff, the district attorney, the chief of police of the Cal-ID member department having the largest number of sworn personnel within the county, a second chief selected by all other police chiefs within the county, the mayor of the city with the greatest population within the county that has a Cal-ID member police department, and a member-at-large chosen by the other members. In any county lacking two chiefs of police, a substitute member shall be selected by the other members of the board.

(d) A county which is a part of a regional board may form a local RAN advisory board. The purpose of the local RAN advisory board shall be to provide advice and recommendations to the county’s representatives on the regional RAN board. The local RAN advisory board may appoint alternate members to the regional RAN board from the local RAN advisory board to serve and work in the place of a regional RAN board member who is absent or who disqualifies himself or herself from participation in a meeting of the regional RAN board.

If a vacancy occurs in the office of a regional RAN board in a county which has established a local RAN advisory board, an alternate member selected by the local RAN advisory board may serve and vote in place of the former regional RAN board member until the appointment of a regional RAN board member is made to fill the vacancy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 73, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

11112.5.

(a) Costs for equipment purchases based upon the master plan approved by the Attorney General, including state sales tax, freight, insurance, and installation, shall be prorated between the state and local governmental entity. The state’s share shall be 70 percent. The local government’s share shall be 30 percent, paid in legal tender. Purchases may be made under the existing Cal-ID contract through the Department of General Services.

(b) Alternatively, at the discretion of the local board, an independent competitive procurement may be initiated under the following conditions:

(1) Prior to submitting a bid in an independent procurement, any prospective bidder must demonstrate the ability to meet or exceed performance levels established in the existing Cal-ID contract and demonstrate the ability to interface with Cal-ID and meet or exceed performance levels established in the existing Cal-ID contract without degrading the performance of the Cal-ID system.

(2) Both qualifying benchmarks will be at the prospective bidder’s expense and will be conducted by the Department of Justice.

(3) In the event that no vendor other than the existing contract vendor qualifies to bid, purchases shall be made by the Department of General Services on behalf of local agencies pursuant to the existing Cal-ID contract.

(c) Competitive local procurements must adhere to the following guidelines:

(1) Administrative requirements contained within Section 5200 of the State Administrative Manual shall be met.

(2) Local procurements shall not increase the costs the state would otherwise be obligated to pay.

(3) Final bids submitted in an independent procurement shall contain a signed contract that represents an irrevocable offer that does not materially deviate from the terms and conditions of the existing Cal-ID contract.

(4) The selected vendor shall post a performance bond in an amount equal to 25 percent of the local equipment costs. The bond shall remain in effect until the local acceptance test has been successfully completed.

(5) Requests for tender, including contract language, shall be approved by the Department of General Services prior to release. The Department of General Services and the Department of Justice shall be represented on the evaluation and selection team.

(d) The local government agency shall be responsible for all costs related to conducting a local bid, site preparation, equipment maintenance, ongoing operational costs, file conversion over and above those records that are available on magnetic media from the Department of Justice, and equipment enhancements or systems design which exceed the basic design specifications of the Department of Justice. The state shall provide sufficient circuitry to each county, or group of counties to handle all fingerprint data traffic. The state shall provide for annual maintenance of that line.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 699, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

11112.6.

(a) The Cal-ID Telecommunications System shall be under the direction of the Attorney General and shall be used exclusively for the official business of the state, and the official business of any city, county, city and county, or other public agency.

(b) The Cal-ID Telecommunications System shall provide telecommunication lines to one location in every participating county.

(c) The Cal-ID Telecommunications System shall be maintained at all times by the department with equipment and facilities adequate to meet the needs of law enforcement. The system shall be designed to accommodate present and future data transmission equipment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1234, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

11112.7.

The Attorney General shall provide an annual status report to the Legislature beginning January 1, 1987, with the final report due January 1, 1990. The report shall include the status of the project to date, funds expended, and need, if any, for revision to the master plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1263, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Criminal Records [11115. - 11117.]

11115.

In any case in which a sheriff, police department or other law enforcement agency makes an arrest and transmits a report of the arrest to the Department of Justice or to the Federal Bureau of Investigation, it shall be the duty of such law enforcement agency to furnish a disposition report to such agencies whenever the arrested person is transferred to the custody of another agency or is released without having a complaint or accusation filed with a court. The disposition report in such cases shall be furnished to the appropriate agencies within 30 days of release or transfer to another agency.

If either of the following dispositions is made, the disposition report shall so state:

(a) “Arrested for intoxication and released,” when the arrested party is released pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 849.

(b) “Detention only,” when the detained party is released pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 849 or issued a certificate pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 851.6. In such cases the report shall state the specific reason for such release, indicating that there was no ground for making a criminal complaint because (1) further investigation exonerated the arrested party, (2) the complainant withdrew the complaint, (3) further investigation appeared necessary before prosecution could be initiated, (4) the ascertainable evidence was insufficient to proceed further, (5) the admissible or adducible evidence was insufficient to proceed further, or (6) other appropriate explanation for release.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

11116.5.

Any dismissal and reason therefor provided by Section 11115 or 13151. 1 may be used by the person subject to the disposition as an answer to any question regarding his arrest or detention history or any question regarding the outcome of a criminal proceeding against him.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

11116.6.

The dispositions provided by Sections 11115 and 13151.1 must be entered on all appropriate records of the party arrested, detained, or against whom criminal proceedings are brought.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

11116.7.

Whenever an accusatory pleading is filed in any court of this state alleging a public offense for which a defendant may be punished by incarceration, for a period in excess of 90 days, the court shall furnish upon request of the defendant named therein a certificate of disposition which describes the disposition of the accusatory pleading in that court when such disposition is one described in Section 13151.1. The certificate of disposition shall be signed by the judge, shall substantially conform with the requirements of Section 11116.8, and the seal of the court shall be affixed thereto.

In the event that the initial disposition of the accusatory pleading is changed, a new disposition certificate showing the changed disposition shall be issued by the court changing the same upon request of the defendant or his counsel of record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

11116.8.

The certificate of disposition provided by Section 11116.7 shall describe the charge or charges set forth in the original and any amended accusatory pleading, together with the disposition of each charge in the original and any amended accusatory pleading.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

11116.9.

The clerk of the court in which the disposition is made shall provide the defendant or his counsel of record with additional certified copies of the disposition certificate upon the payment of the fees provided by law for certified copies of court records.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1279.)
-------------------------------------------

11116.10.

(a) Upon the request of a victim or a witness of a crime, the prosecuting attorney shall, within 30 days of the final disposition of the case, inform the victim or witness by letter of such final disposition. Such notice shall state the information described in Section 13151.1.

(b) As used in this section, “victim” means any person alleged or found, upon the record, to have sustained physical or financial injury to person or property as a direct result of the crime charged.

(c) As used in this section, “witness” means any person who has been or is expected to testify for the prosecution, or
 who, by reason of having relevant information, is subject to call or likely to be called as a witness for the prosecution, whether or not any action or proceeding has yet been commenced.

(d) As used in this section, “final disposition,” means an ultimate termination of the case at the trial level including, but not limited to, dismissal, acquittal, or imposition of sentence by the court, or a decision by the prosecuting attorney, for whatever reason, not to file the case.

(e) Subdivision (a) does not apply in any case where the offender or alleged offender is a minor unless the minor has been declared not a fit and proper subject to be dealt with under the juvenile court law.

(f) This section shall not apply to any
 case in which a disposition was made prior to the effective date of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 715, Sec. 5.   (SB 464)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11117.

The Department of Justice shall prescribe and furnish the procedures and forms to be used for the disposition and other reports required in this article and in Sections 13151 and 13152. The department shall add the reports received to all appropriate criminal records.

Neither the reports required in this article nor those required in Sections 13151 and 13152 shall be admissible in evidence in any civil action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 152, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Examination of Records [11120. - 11127.]

11120.

As used in this article, “record” with respect to any person means the state summary criminal history information as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 11105, maintained under such person’s name by the Department of Justice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1222.)
-------------------------------------------

11121.

It is the function and intent of this article to afford persons concerning whom a record is maintained in the files of the bureau an opportunity to obtain a copy of the record compiled from such files, and to refute any erroneous or inaccurate information contained therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 939, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11122.

Any person desiring a copy of the record relating to himself shall obtain an application form furnished by the department which shall require his fingerprints in addition to such other information as the department shall specify. Applications may be obtained from police departments, sheriff departments, or the Department of Justice. The fingerprinting agency may fix a reasonable fee for affixing the applicant’s fingerprints to the form, and shall retain such fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 939, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11123.

The applicant shall submit the completed application directly to the department. The application shall be accompanied by a fee not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25) that the department determines equals the costs of processing the application and providing a copy of the record to the applicant. All fees received by the department under this section are hereby appropriated without regard to fiscal years for the support of the Department of Justice in addition to such other funds as may be appropriated therefor by the Legislature. Any request for waiver of fee shall accompany the original request for the record and shall include a claim and proof of indigency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 939, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

11124.

When an application is received by the department, the department shall determine whether a record pertaining to the applicant is maintained. If such record is maintained, the department shall furnish a copy of the record to the applicant or to an individual designated by the applicant. If no such record is maintained, the department shall so notify the applicant or an individual designated by the applicant. Delivery of the copy of the record, or notice of no record, may be by mail or other appropriate means agreed to by the applicant and the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 939, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

11125.

No person or agency shall require or request another person to furnish a copy of a record or notification that a record exists or does not exist, as provided in Section 11124. A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1227, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

11126.

(a) If the applicant desires to question the accuracy or completeness of any material matter contained in the record, the applicant may submit a written request to the department in a form established by it. The request shall include a statement of the alleged inaccuracy or incompleteness in the record, and its materiality, and shall specify any proof or corroboration available. Upon receipt of the request, the department shall review the record to determine if the information correctly reflects the source document, and if it does not, the department shall make the necessary corrections
 and shall provide the applicant with a corrected copy of the record. If the accuracy of the source document is questioned, the department shall forward it to the person or agency which furnished the questioned information. This person or agency shall, within 30 days of receipt of the written request for clarification, review its information and forward to the department the results of the review.

(b) If the agency concurs in the allegations of inaccuracy or incompleteness in the record, and finds that the error is material, it shall correct its record and shall so inform the department, which shall correct the record accordingly. The department shall inform the applicant of its correction of the record under this subdivision within 30 days. The department and the agency shall notify all persons and agencies to which they have disseminated the incorrect record in the past 90 days of the correction of the record, and the applicant shall be
 informed that the notification has been given. The department and the agency shall also notify those persons or agencies to which the incorrect record has been disseminated which have been specifically requested by the applicant to receive notification of the correction of the record, and the applicant shall be informed that the notification has been given.

(c) If the department or the agency denies the allegations of inaccuracy or incompleteness in the record, the matter shall be referred for administrative adjudication in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code for a determination of whether material inaccuracy or incompleteness exists in the record. The department shall be the respondent in the hearing. If a material inaccuracy or incompleteness is found in any record, the department and the agency in charge of that record shall be directed to correct it accordingly. The
 department and the agency shall notify all persons and agencies to which they have disseminated the incorrect record in the past 90 days of the correction of the record, and the applicant shall be informed that the notification has been given. The department and the agency shall also notify those persons or agencies to which the incorrect record has been disseminated which have been specifically requested by the applicant to receive notification of the correction of the record, and the applicant shall be informed that the notification has been given. Judicial review of the decision shall be governed by Section 11523 of the Government Code. The applicant shall be informed of the decision within 30 days of its issuance in accordance with Section 11518 of the Government Code.

(d) Subdivision (c) does not apply to allegations of inaccuracy or incompleteness in the
 record based on record relief available pursuant to Section 851.93 or 1203.425 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 49, Sec. 13.   (AB 168)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11127.

The department shall adopt all regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Unlawful Furnishing of State Summary Criminal History Information [11140. - 11144.]

11140.

As used in this article:

(a) “Record” means the state summary criminal history information as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 11105, or a copy thereof, maintained under a person’s name by the Department of Justice.

(b) “A person authorized by law to receive a record” means any person or public agency authorized by a court, statute, or decisional law to receive a record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1222.)
-------------------------------------------

11141.

Any employee of the Department of Justice who knowingly furnishes a record or information obtained from a record to a person who is not authorized by law to receive the record or information is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 963.)
-------------------------------------------

11142.

Any person authorized by law to receive a record or information obtained from a record who knowingly furnishes the record or information to a person who is not authorized by law to receive the record or information is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 963.)
-------------------------------------------

11143.

Any person, except those specifically referred to in Section 1070 of the Evidence Code, who, knowing he is not authorized by law to receive a record or information obtained from a record, knowingly buys, receives, or possesses the record or information is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 963.)
-------------------------------------------

11144.

(a) It is not a violation of this article to disseminate statistical or research information obtained from a record, provided that the identity of the subject of the record is not disclosed.

(b) It is not a violation of this article to disseminate information obtained from a record for the purpose of assisting in the apprehension of a person wanted in connection with the commission of a crime.

(c) It is not a violation of this article to include information obtained from a record in (1) a transcript or record of a judicial or administrative proceeding or (2) any other public record when the inclusion of the information in the public record is authorized by a court, statute, or decisional law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 963.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. National Search of Criminal Records [11145. - 11149.4.]

11145.

In lieu of a national check of fingerprint records conducted by the Federal Bureau of Investigation through the California Department of Justice, state agencies shall contract with an independent vendor to conduct a national search of the individuals’ criminal records, as provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1222, Sec. 2.   Effective September 22, 1982.   Conditionally inoperative by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1222.)
-------------------------------------------

11146.

This chapter applies to:

(a) The Commission on Teacher Credentialing, in licensing of all teaching and services credential applicants, pursuant to Section 44341 of the Education Code.

(b) The State Department of Social Services in licensing those community care facility operators providing services to children as mandated in Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) The county welfare department in carrying out its approval authority for relative and nonrelative extended family member foster care placements pursuant to Section 309 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 471, Sec. 28.   (SB 1329)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1222.)
-------------------------------------------

11147.

In order that a thorough search may be conducted, the agencies listed in Section 11146 shall require applicants, as a condition of employment or licensing, to provide (a) their social security and drivers’ license numbers, (b) educational history, (c) three personal references, (d) a five-year employment and residence history, and, (e) if appropriate, any other names they may have been known under. This information shall be provided under penalty of perjury.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1222, Sec. 2.   Effective September 22, 1982.   Conditionally inoperative by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1222.)
-------------------------------------------

11148.

The agencies listed in Section 11146 may contract with any vendor demonstrating the capability to conduct such background searches in a timely manner and with the assurance of complete confidentiality. Any such vendor shall (a) be a licensed private investigator as defined in Section 7521 of the Business and Professions Code; (b) have been in business for at least five years; (c) be able to furnish bank references; (d) provide a minimum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) in liability insurance, with the contracting agency being named as an additional insured; and (e) be able to provide services, via subcontracts if necessary, in all areas of the state.

No contract shall be let unless it provides therein that the cost per applicant for a search, including administrative costs, shall not exceed forty dollars ($40). The state shall not be liable for any amount in excess of forty dollars ($40) per applicant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1222, Sec. 2.   Effective September 22, 1982.   Conditionally inoperative by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1222.)
-------------------------------------------

11149.

In order to expedite the work of the vendor, all applications submitted to the vendor shall include the results of the fingerprint checks conducted by the California Department of Justice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1222, Sec. 2.   Effective September 22, 1982.   Conditionally inoperative by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1222.)
-------------------------------------------

11149.1.

Vendors are exempted from any provisions of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code which prevent the vendor from conducting the national search of individual criminal records required by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1222, Sec. 2.   Effective September 22, 1982.   Conditionally inoperative by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1222.)
-------------------------------------------

11149.2.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, applicants may be charged for the actual cost of the national search required by this statute, including administrative costs, not to exceed forty dollars ($40).

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1222, Sec. 2.   Effective September 22, 1982.   Conditionally inoperative by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1222.)
-------------------------------------------

11149.3.

Any vendor or employee of a vendor who knowingly furnishes a record or information obtained from a record to a person who is not authorized by law to receive the record or information shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or imprisoned in a county jail for not more than one year, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1222, Sec. 2.   Effective September 22, 1982.   Conditionally inoperative by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1222.)
-------------------------------------------

11149.4.

Any vendor or employee of a vendor who intentionally discloses information, not otherwise public, which that person knows or should reasonably know was obtained from confidential information, shall be subject to a civil action for invasion of privacy by the individual to whom the information pertains.

In any successful action brought under this section, the complainant, in addition to any special or general damages awarded, shall be awarded a minimum of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) in exemplary damages as well as attorney’s fees and other litigation costs reasonably incurred in the suit.

The right, remedy, and cause of action set forth in this section shall be nonexclusive and is in addition to all other rights, remedies, and causes of action for invasion of privacy, inherent in Section 1, Article I of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1222, Sec. 2.   Effective September 22, 1982.   Conditionally inoperative by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1222.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Control of Crimes and Criminals [11150. - 11199.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. Release of Persons Convicted of Arson [11150. - 11152.]

11150.

Prior to the release of a person convicted of arson from an institution under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections, the Director of Corrections shall notify in writing the State Fire Marshal and all police departments and the sheriff in the county in which the person was convicted and, if known, in the county in which he is to reside. The notice shall state the name of the person to be released, the county in which he was convicted and, if known, the county in which he will reside.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 919, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

11151.

Within five days after release of a person convicted of arson from an institution under the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals, the Director of State Hospitals shall send the notice provided in Section 11150.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 48.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

11152.

Upon receipt of a notice as provided in Section 11150 or 11151, the State Fire Marshal shall notify all regularly organized fire departments in the county in which the person was convicted and, if known, in the county in which he is to reside.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 919, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Reports of Disposition of Inmates [11155. - 11158.]

11155.

(a) As soon as placement of an inmate in any reentry or work furlough program is planned, but in no case less than 60 days prior to that placement, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall provide notice, if notice has been requested, to all of the following: (1) written notice to the chief of police of the city, if any, in which the inmate will reside, if known, or in which placement will be
 made, (2) written notice to the sheriff of the county in which the inmate will reside, if known, or in which placement will be made, and (3) notice, as provided in subdivision (d), to the victim, if any, of the crime for which the inmate was convicted or the next of kin of the victim if the crime was a homicide, if the victim or the next of kin has submitted a request for notice with the department. Information regarding victims or next of kin requesting the notice, and the notice, shall be confidential and not available to the inmate.

(b) In the event of an escape of an inmate from any facility under the jurisdiction of the department, the department shall immediately notify, by the most reasonable and expedient means available, the chief of police of the city, and the sheriff of the county, in which the inmate resided immediately prior to the inmate’s arrest and conviction, and, if previously requested, to the victim, if any, of the crime for
 which the inmate was convicted, or to the next of kin of the victim if the crime was a homicide. If the inmate is recaptured, the department shall send written notice thereof to the chief of police and the sheriff, and notice to the victim, or next of kin of the victim, within 30 days after regaining custody of the inmate.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (d), the department shall send the notices required by this section to the last address provided to the department by the requesting party. It is the responsibility of the requesting party to provide the department with a current address.

(d) Whenever the department provides the notice required by this section to a victim, or next of kin of the victim, it shall do so by telephone, certified mail, or electronic mail, using the method of communication selected by the victim or the next of kin of the victim, if that method is
 available. In the event the victim’s or next of kin’s contact information provided to the department is no longer current, the department shall make a diligent, good faith effort to learn the whereabouts of the victim in order to comply with these notification requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 364, Sec. 5.   (SB 852)   Effective September 29, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

11156.

The notice sent to the chief of police and county sheriff pursuant to Section 11155 shall include an actual glossy photograph no smaller than 318 x 318 inches in size, in conjunction with the Department of Justice, fingerprints of each inmate in the reentry or work furlough program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 600, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

11157.

The victims may be notified of the opportunity to receive the notices provided by this article by means of adding a paragraph to the information contained on subpoena forms which are used in subpoenaing victims as material witnesses to any court proceedings resulting from the perpetration of the crime in which the victim was involved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1048, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11158.

As used in this article, “victim” means any person alleged or found, upon the record, to have sustained physical or financial injury to person or property as a direct result of the crime charged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1048, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Reports of Injuries [11160. - 11163.6.]

11160.

(a) A health practitioner, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 11162.5, employed by a health facility, clinic, physician’s office, local or state public health department, local government agency, or a clinic or other type of facility operated by a local or state public health department who, in the health practitioner’s professional capacity or within the scope of the health practitioner’s employment, provides medical services for a physical condition to a patient whom the health practitioner knows or reasonably suspects is a person described as follows, shall immediately make a report in accordance with subdivision (b):

(1) A person suffering from a wound or other physical injury inflicted by the person’s own act or inflicted by another where the injury is by
 means of a firearm.

(2) A person suffering from a wound or other physical injury inflicted upon the person where the injury is the result of assaultive or abusive conduct.

(b) A health practitioner, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 11162.5, employed by a health facility, clinic, physician’s office, local or state public health department, local government agency, or a clinic or other type of facility operated by a local or state public health department shall make a report regarding persons described in subdivision (a) to a local law enforcement agency as follows:

(1) A report by telephone shall be made immediately or as soon as practically possible.

(2) A written report shall be prepared on the standard form developed in compliance with
 paragraph (4), and adopted by the Office of Emergency Services, or on a form developed and adopted by another state agency that otherwise fulfills the requirements of the standard form. The completed form shall be sent to a local law enforcement agency within two working days of receiving the information regarding the person.

(3) A local law enforcement agency shall be notified and a written report shall be prepared and sent pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) even if the person who suffered the wound, other injury, or assaultive or abusive conduct has expired, regardless of whether or not the wound, other injury, or assaultive or abusive conduct was a factor contributing to the death, and even if the evidence of the conduct of the perpetrator of the wound, other injury, or assaultive or abusive conduct was discovered during an autopsy.

(4) The report shall include, but shall not
 be limited to, the following:

(A) The name of the injured person, if known.

(B) The injured person’s whereabouts.

(C) The character and extent of the person’s injuries.

(D) The identity of any person the injured person alleges inflicted the wound, other injury, or assaultive or abusive conduct upon the injured person.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “injury” does not include any psychological or physical condition brought about solely through the voluntary administration of a narcotic or restricted dangerous drug.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “assaultive or abusive conduct” includes any of the following
 offenses:

(1) Murder, in violation of Section 187.

(2) Manslaughter, in violation of Section 192 or 192.5.

(3) Mayhem, in violation of Section 203.

(4) Aggravated mayhem, in violation of Section 205.

(5) Torture, in violation of Section 206.

(6) Assault with intent to commit mayhem, rape, sodomy, or oral copulation, in violation of Section 220.

(7) Administering controlled substances or anesthetic to aid in commission of a felony, in violation of Section 222.

(8) Battery, in violation of Section
 242.

(9) Sexual battery, in violation of Section 243.4.

(10) Incest, in violation of Section 285.

(11) Throwing any vitriol, corrosive acid, or caustic chemical with intent to injure or disfigure, in violation of Section 244.
